Hawaii statutes.
§490:2A-517 Revocation of acceptance of
goods. (a) A lessee may revoke acceptance of a lot or commercial unit
whose nonconformity substantially impairs its value to the lessee if the lessee
has accepted it:

(1) Except in the case of a finance lease, on the
reasonable assumption that its nonconformity would be cured and it has not been
seasonably cured; or

(2) Without discovery of the nonconformity if the
lessee's acceptance was reasonably induced either by the lessor's assurances
or, except in the case of a finance lease, by the difficulty of discovery
before acceptance.

(b) Except in the case of a finance lease that
is not a consumer lease, a lessee may revoke acceptance of a lot or commercial
unit if the lessor defaults under the lease contract and the default
substantially impairs the value of that lot or commercial unit to the lessee.

(c) If the lease agreement so provides, the
lessee may revoke acceptance of a lot or commercial unit because of other
defaults by the lessor.

(d) Revocation of acceptance must occur within
a reasonable time after the lessee discovers or should have discovered the
ground for it and before any substantial change in condition of the goods which
is not caused by the nonconformity. Revocation is not effective until the
lessee notifies the lessor.

(e) A lessee who so revokes has the same
rights and duties with regard to the goods involved as if the lessee had
rejected them. [L 1991, c 40, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next